North Dakota, session 69, HB1618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - TRIBAL
SCHOOL INFRASTRUCTURE GRANT. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general
fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $1,387,256, or so much of the
sum as may be necessary, to the department of public instruction for the purpose of providing a
tribal school infrastructure grant, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30,
2027. A tribal elementary or secondary school may apply to the department of public instruction
for an infrastructure project grant under this section. To be eligible to receive a grant, a recipient
must provide $346,814 of matching funds for the project.
Page No. 1 25.1331.01000